Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,305
Law enforcement officer; judge; attorney; agents or employees; immunity.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section 81-1401; and

(b) Prohibited content has the same meaning as in section 25-21,304.

(2) There shall be no civil or criminal liability for the viewing or possession of prohibited content by:

(a) A judge who does so in good faith and for purposes of a proceeding before the court;

(b) An attorney who does so in good faith in the course of representing a client or potential client;

(c) An agent or employee of a judge or attorney who does so in good faith and for a legitimate purpose while acting within the scope of such agency or employment; or

(d) A law enforcement officer who does so in good faith in the course of his or her official duties.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 7.
July 18, 2026